ro_RO.aff
SFX P Y 57
SFX P   0     u      [^u]
SFX P   0     u-i      [^u]
SFX P   0     ul      [^u]            s.n.sg.art.
SFX P   0     ului    [^u]            s.n.sg.dat.
SFX P   0     ule    [^u]
SFX P   0     e       [^dginprut]    s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   0     ele     [^dginprut]    s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   0     elor    [^dginprut]    s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   0     e       [^o][dg]         s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   0     ele     [^o][dg]        s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   0     elor    [^o][dg]         s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   0     e       [^n]t             s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   0     ele     [^n]t             s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   0     elor    [^n]t             s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   0     e       [^â]nt            s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   0     ele     [^â]nt           s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   0     elor    [^â]nt           s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   ânt   inte    ânt              s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   ânt   intele  ânt             s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   ânt   intelor ânt             s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   g     age     og              s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   g     agele   og             s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   g     agelor  og             s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   od     oade     od              s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   od     oadele   od              s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   od     oadelor  od              s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   p     ape     op               s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   p     apele   op               s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   p     apelor  op               s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   i      aie     oi                 s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   i      aiele     oi              s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   i      aielor     oi             s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   0     e       [^o]r             s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   0     ele     [^o]r             s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   0     elor    [^o]r             s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   i     e       ci                  s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   i     ele     ci                  s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   i     elor    ci                  s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   r     are     or                 s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   r     arele   or                 s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   r     arelor  or                 s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   n     ane     on                 s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   n     anele   on                 s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   n     anelor  on                 s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   0     e       [^o]n                 s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   0     ele     [^o]n                 s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   0     elor    [^o]n                 s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   0     l       u                        s.n.sg.art.
SFX P   0     i       u                       
SFX P   0     le     u
SFX P   0     lui     u                        s.n.sg.dat.
SFX P   u     i       iu                        s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   u     ile     iu                       s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   u     ilor    iu                       s.n.pl.dat.
SFX P   u     e       [^i]u                 s.n.pl.neart.
SFX P   u     ele     [^i]u                 s.n.pl.art.
SFX P   u     elor    [^i]u                 s.n.pl.dat.

SFX z Y 64
SFX z 0 ul ol
SFX z 0 ul oș
SFX z 0 ul oc
SFX z 0 ul om
SFX z 0 ul oz
SFX z 0 ul ov
SFX z 0 ul oi
SFX z 0 ul on
SFX z 0 u ol
SFX z 0 u oș
SFX z 0 u oc
SFX z 0 u om
SFX z 0 u oz
SFX z 0 u ov
SFX z 0 u oi
SFX z 0 u on
SFX z 0 u-i ol
SFX z 0 u-i oș
SFX z 0 u-i oc
SFX z 0 u-i om
SFX z 0 u-i oz
SFX z 0 u-i ov
SFX z 0 u-i oi
SFX z 0 u-i on
SFX z 0 ule ol
SFX z 0 ule oș
SFX z 0 ule oc
SFX z 0 ule om
SFX z 0 ule oz
SFX z 0 ule ov
SFX z 0 ule oi
SFX z 0 ule on
SFX z 0 ului ol
SFX z 0 ului oș
SFX z 0 ului oc
SFX z 0 ului om
SFX z 0 ului oz
SFX z 0 ului ov
SFX z 0 ului oi
SFX z 0 ului on
SFX z ol oale ol
SFX z oș oașe oș
SFX z oc oace oc
SFX z om oame om
SFX z oz oaze oz
SFX z ov oave ov
SFX z ov oaie oi
SFX z ov oane on
SFX z ol oalele ol
SFX z oș oașele oș
SFX z oc oacele oc
SFX z om oamele om
SFX z oz oazele oz
SFX z ov oavele ov
SFX z ov oaiele oi
SFX z ov oanele on
SFX z ol oalelor ol
SFX z oș oașelor oș
SFX z oc oacelor oc
SFX z om oamelor om
SFX z oz oazelor oz
SFX z ov oavelor ov
SFX z ov oaielor oi
SFX z ov oanelor on


#end********************************************************************************

#********************************************************************************
# adjective
SFX D Y 12
SFX D 0 u .
SFX D 0 ul .
SFX D 0 ule .
SFX D 0 ului .
SFX D 0 i .
SFX D 0 ii .
SFX D 0 ilor .
SFX D 0 a .
SFX D 0 ă .
SFX D 0 e .
SFX D 0 ele .
SFX D 0 elor .
PFX D Y 1
PFX D 0 ne .

SFX S Y 14
SFX S ic icu ic
SFX S ic icule ic
SFX S ic icul ic                       adj.m.sg.neart.
SFX S ic icului ic                       adj.m.sg.dat.
SFX S ic ici ic                       adj.m.pl.neart.
SFX S ic icii ic                       adj.m.pl.art.
SFX S ic icilor ic                       adj.m.pl.dat.
SFX S ic ică ic                        adj.f.sg.neart.
SFX S ic ica ic                        adj.f.sg.art.
SFX S ic ico ic
SFX S ic icei ic                         adj.f.sg.dat.
SFX S ic ice ic                          adj.f.pl.neart.
SFX S ic icele ic                        adj.f.pl.dat.
SFX S ic icelor ic                       adj.f.pl.dat.
PFX S Y 1
PFX S 0 ne .

SFX q Y 12
SFX q   0     u      .
SFX q   0     ul      .            adj. m. sg. art.
SFX q   0     ului    .            adj. m. sg. dat.
SFX q   0     i       .      adj. m. pl.
SFX q   0     ii      .      adj. m. pl. art.
SFX q   0     ilor    .      adj. m. pl. dat.
SFX q   0    ă
SFX q   0    a
SFX q   0    ei
SFX q   0    e
SFX q   0    ele
SFX q   0    elor
PFX q Y 1
PFX q 0 ne .
