ro_RO.dic
aalenian/q
abstractiv/D
achizitiv/D
aciuaș/P
aclinic/S
acvaterariu/P
acvatic/S
adaptativ/D
adhortativ/D
aerobiotic/S
aerotopograf/P
agabaritic/S
agroameliorativ/D
agrometeorologic/S
albuminometru/P
alcoolic/S
algologic/S
altaic/S
altitelemetru/P
altoi/z
amendativ/D
amnăruș/P
ampelografic/S
amplificativ/D
anafilactic/S
analitic/S
analog/q
anastomotic/S
ancolaj/P
angloamerican/q
aniversativ/D
anorectic/S
antal/P
antiamerican/q
antic/S
antifonic/S
antinomic/S
antirepublican/q
antiseismic/S
antisicativ/D
antizimic/S
antofag/q
antrenament/P
aperiodic/S
apetitiv/D
apraxic/S
apuntaj/P
araucan/q
argumentativ/D
aritmometru/P
artritic/S
asentiment/P
asertiv/D
aspectiv/D
astmatic/S
atentat/P
atentiv/D
atomoelectric/S
autoadeziv/D
autocaptor/P
autoritativ/D
autovan/P
axonometric/S
baban/q
bagaj/P
balanofag/q
balonament/P
barimetru/P
batracofag/q
bavardaj/P
bazic/S
bentofag/q
bibliofag/q
biciclu/P
bimetalic/S
bioactiv/D
biofag/q
biologic/S
biplan/P
blastodermic/S
bolindeț/P
boloboc/z
braconaj/P
brumatic/S
brâuleț/P
bulon/P
butoi/z
bârneț/P
băcăuan/q
cadențmetru/P
caldecan/q
calic/S
calificativ/P
calitativ/D
canțonier/P
cardan/P
cardiotoxic/S
carpofag/q
carusel/P
catodic/S
cauter/P
ceasoslov/z
celebrativ/D
celostat/P
centrafrican/q
cervid/P
cetonic/S
cheratom/z
chimiotropism/P
chiștoc/z
cifric/S
cimometru/P
ciopor/P
cistosarcom/z
citologic/S
clarinet/P
clocit/P
cocoloș/z
codomeniu/P
coercitiv/D
coeziv/D
cojoc/z
coleretic/S
colorgraf/P
comentativ/D
comiserativ/D
comizerativ/D
compensativ/D
compilativ/D
compliment/P
compozitiv/D
compresiv/D
comunicativ/D
conativ/D
condensiv/D
condom/z
confesiv/D
conformator/P
conjunctiv/D
consecutiv/D
considerativ/D
constativ/D
continent/P
contraceptiv/D
contrarotativ/D
control/z
convertor/P
cooperativ/D
coordonativ/D
coprofag/q
cornuleț/P
coroziv/D
cosmogonic/S
costeliv/D
cotrog/P
creofag/q
crinoid/P
culminativ/D
cuptoraș/P
curativ/D
cvietiv/D
dactilografiat/P
declamativ/D
decliv/D
decorativ/D
decuvaj/P
defectiv/D
definitiv/D
degresiv/D
deictic/S
dendrofag/q
deopotriv/D
depănat/P
descongestiv/D
desicativ/D
detersiv/D
detritofag/q
dezinfectant/P
diamagnetic/S
diferențiativ/D
digestiv/D
directiv/D
disipativ/D
dispecerat/P
disuasiv/D
divulgativ/D
documentaristic/S
dominican/q
donativ/D
dublor/P
echilibristic/S
ectoderm/P
edificativ/D
elastic/S
elativ/D
electronic/S
elicopter/P
emancipativ/D
embriotomic/S
endofag/q
endotermic/S
endoxilofag/q
energofag/q
entomofag/q
epidictic/S
epigraf/P
ergativ/D
ergonomic/S
etimologic/S
eupeptic/S
eurafrican/q
eurifag/q
eutectoid/P
evaluativ/D
excursiv/D
exfoliativ/D
expresiv/D
extralingvistic/S
extraspectiv/D
fagocit/P
fatidic/S
fibrometru/P
filofag/q
filologic/S
fitofag/q
flegmatic/S
fluierat/P
fonologic/S
fotomicrografic/S
fotomodel/P
franciscan/q
ftizic/S
furnal/P
galactofag/q
galican/q
gazogenerator/P
genic/S
geofag/q
germanic/S
gheomotoc/z
ghioșaj/P
golomoz/z
gongoric/S
graifer/P
guvernativ/D
guvernământ/P
hagiologic/S
heliometric/S
hematofag/q
hematometru/P
hemofag/q
hemoragic/S
hepatom/z
heterofag/q
hidradenom/z
hidrodinamic/S
himeric/S
hipocentru/P
hipodermic/S
hipofag/q
homeopatic/S
homofag/q
hrisov/z
hădărău/P
iarmaroc/z
idilic/S
ihtiofag/q
iluziv/D
imagistic/S
impresiv/D
inagresiv/D
inclusiv/D
increment/P
inițiatic/S
injectiv/D
insonor/q
inspectiv/D
intelectiv/D
interdictiv/D
intransitiv/D
invectiv/D
iodometric/S
ionizor/P
italic/S
ivorian/q
jamaican/q
jonctiv/D
kil/P
lactogenetic/S
latinoamerican/q
legănuș/P
leucom/z
limfadenom/z
limfangiom/z
limfom/z
limfosarcom/z
limnimetric/S
lipofibrom/z
lipom/z
liposarco/z
liposarcom/z
litigiu/P
litofag/q
luciferic/S
lucrativ/D
lăptoc/z
lătoc/z
lăzăret/P
magnetohidrodinamic/S
mahomedan/q
malofag/q
manometru/P
marocan/q
marțian/q
matronimic/S
medalion/P
melanom/z
melanosarcom/z
melifag/q
melodramatic/S
metalochimic/S
meteorologic/S
metraj/P
metronom/z
mexican/q
miasmatic/S
micetofag/q
microdispozitiv/D
microsistem/P
midriatic/S
mijloc/z
miofilament/P
mirmecofag/q
mitotic/S
monobazic/S
monofag/q
monolitic/S
monom/z
monometru/P
morosliv/D
mozambican/q
mucenic/S
multiplexor/P
multiprotocol/z
murg/q
măsurat/P
neartistic/S
necrofag/q
nenoroc/z
neocatolic/S
nepolitic/S
neurom/z
nevrednic/S
nevrom/z
nord-american/q
nordamerican/q
noroc/z
norocel/P
nostalgic/S
nuncupativ/D
obroc/z
observativ/D
ocitocic/S
ocol/z
odontometru/P
ofiofag/q
ogarnic/S
ojoc/z
omofag/q
oncologic/S
oofag/q
opiofag/q
optimetru/P
optometric/S
ornitofag/q
ortodontic/S
ospătarnic/S
ostensiv/D
osteoclast/P
ostrov/z
paleoantropologic/S
paleozoologic/S
palinofag/q
palmaj/P
panafrican/q
panamerican/q
panteistic/S
pantofag/q
paralitic/S
parapet/P
parazitolog/q
parodic/S
parodontom/z
paștet/P
pectic/S
pehliv/D
pelofag/q
pericraniu/P
perimetric/S
perinoc/z
permisiv/D
picon/P
piezorezistiv/D
piretic/S
pistol/z
placaj/P
planctofag/q
planctonofag/q
planisferic/S
pleiofag/q
plugărel/P
pneumatolitic/S
pocinoc/z
policiclic/S
polifag/q
polinom/z
polisintetic/S
politolog/q
polobocel/P
portorican/q
postament/P
postpozitiv/D
poștalion/z
prebiotic/S
predictiv/D
preselector/P
pretensiv/D
prezentativ/D
proactiv/D
proafrican/q
proamerican/q
procedeu/P
procuror/q
profetic/S
profilactiv/D
protectiv/D
protidic/S
protocol/z
prundișor/P
psaltic/S
psihologic/S
punitiv/D
puricat/P
păduratic/S
pătimitiv/D
raclor/P
radioizotopic/S
ras/P
recreditiv/D
reductiv/D
refractiv/D
relascop/P
relatativ/D
reoscopic/S
repetitiv/D
reprezentativ/D
restaurativ/D
revers/P
rezistiv/D
rinolog/q
rizofag/q
romantolog/q
romașcan/q
rostogol/z
rotocol/z
rotofilm/P
rotogol/z
runolog/q
rusav/D
războinic/S
sabordaj/P
salonican/q
saprofag/q
scatofag/q
scleroscop/P
scăzățiv/D
selenolog/q
semantic/S
semiinstinctiv/D
senat/P
sensitiv/D
sicativ/D
simbol/z
simfer/P
simptom/z
sociativ/D
sociocognitiv/D
sondaj/P
soroc/z
specificativ/D
spinotalamic/S
sportiv/D
staminodiu/P
stomatolog/q
struțișor/P
subiectiv/D
subminativ/D
substitutiv/D
sudafrican/q
sudamerican/q
sugativ/D
sumativ/D
superaliaj/P
supletiv/D
supranormativ/D
supurativ/D
suspensiv/D
sărăcan/q
tabar/P
tahistoscopic/S
taroc/z
tatuaj/P
tehnolog/q
tehnopsihologic/S
telecontrol/z
tematologic/S
tempestiv/D
tendalet/P
teratom/z
termoelectric/S
tetravanghel/P
tiflografic/S
torent/P
toscan/q
toxic/S
toxicolog/q
trahom/z
transafrican/q
transductiv/D
tranzitiv/D
traumatolog/q
trenograf/P
tribologic/S
trinom/z
tropar/P
târboc/P
târcol/z
uituc/D
ultrasonic/S
unicolor/D
uragan/P
vag/q
vatican/q
veac/P
vecinic/S
venerolog/q
vidicon/P
voloc/z
voltaic/S
vomitoriu/P
vulcanolog/q
vădan/D
xantoclor/q
zapis/P
zavistnic/S
zoolog/q
zădarnic/S
zălăuan/q
zăngăt/P
întinzător/P
șlefuit/P
țesălat/P
țurcan/q
